fst/lexc/git_functional.txt
Multichar_Symbols
+P
+PRO
PN
ASSOC
PROX
DIST
PL_
+DEM
AX
1SG.III
1PL.III
2SG.III
2PL.III
3.III
3PL.III

LEXICON Root
	Preposition ;
	Conjunction ;
	Pronoun ;
	NProclitic ;
	Quotative ;
	SeriesI ;
	SeriesIprocl ;
	Operator;

LEXICON Preposition
g_$o'o+P:g_$o'o	# ;
g_$o'o+P:g_$o'o	SeriesII ;
g_$oo+P:g_$oo	# ;
g_$oo+P:g_$oo	SeriesII ;
g_$a'a+P:g_$a'a	# ;
g_$a'a+P:g_$a'a	SeriesII ;
'$a+P:'$a 			# ;
'$a+P:'$a 			AgreeingNClitic ;
'$a+P-OBL:'$a^l$oo		AgreeingNClitic ;

LEXICON Conjunction
g_an+CNJ:g_an		NextNClitic ;
'$oo+CNJ:'$oo			# ;

LEXICON Pronoun
1SG.III+PRO:'nii'y 	Word ;
1PL.III+PRO:'nuu'm	Word ;
2SG.III+PRO:'niin 	Word ;
2PL.III+PRO:'nisi'm 	Word ;
3.III+PRO:'nit 		Word ;
3PL.III+PRO:'nidiit 	Word ;
1SG+OBL:loo'y 	Word ;
1PL+OBL:loo'm	Word ;
2SG+OBL:loon 	Word ;
2PL+OBL:loosi'm 	Word ;
3+OBL:loot 		Word ;
3PL+OBL:loodiit 	Word ;

LEXICON NProclitic
PN:t		# ;
PN:t		DemonstrativeClitic ;
ASSOC:dip	# ;
ASSOC:dip	DemonstrativeClitic ;

LEXICON DemonstrativeClitic
=PROX+DEM:=un	Word ;
=DIST+DEM:=ust	Word ;

LEXICON Quotative
1SG+QUOT:niy$a	QuotativeEnding ;
2SG+QUOT:miy$a	QuotativeEnding ;
3SG+QUOT:diy$a	QuotativeEnding ;
1PL+QUOT:diph$ii		QuotativePlEnding ;
2PL+QUOT:masimh$ii	QuotativePlEnding ;
3PL+QUOT:dah$iit	QuotativePlEnding ;
3PL+QUOT:d$iit		QuotativePlEnding ;

LEXICON QuotativePlEnding
				# ;
-3PL.INDP:^da 	QuotativeEnding ;

LEXICON QuotativeEnding
	NextNClitic ;
	SecPosClitic ;

LEXICON Operator
FOC+OP:dii		SeriesIencl ;
FOC+OP:dii		PNClitic;
PART+OP:hli		SeriesIencl ;
AX+OP:an 		SeriesIencl3 ;
DWID+OP:l$igi	PNClitic ;
